output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.dic
upolnomočevati/Iu
meteorolog/Iv
vugolj/Iw
kaky/Ix
boz/Iy
tri/Iz
sobrati/JA
novosti/JB
jug/JC
dreti/JD
usta/JE
tutoj/JF
jagne/JG
droždže/JH
klěšče/JH
ves/JI
izrasti/JJ
evropejsky/Ix
evropsky/Ix
vrata/JE
ideolog/Iv
tamtoj/JF
zavojevati/Iu
bojevati/Iu
ekolog/Iv
ktory/Ix
luksemburg/JC
bog/Iv
četyri/Iz
toj/JF
dveri/JB
rasti/JJ
nočevati/Iu
biolog/Iv
prěnočevati/Iu
arheolog/Iv
nevrolog/Iv
děti/JB
maljevati/Iu
nožice/JH
vojevati/Iu
jihny/Ix
dvojčeta/JE
prěrasti/JJ
suprug/Iv
věsti/JB
vrag/Iv
zarasti/JJ
drug/Iv
jetra/JE
lěta/JE
tele/JG
šesterčeta/JE
trojčeta/JE
prase/JG
žrěbe/JG
dorasti/JJ
vozrasti/JJ
četverčeta/JE
peterčeta/JE
trojny/Ix
četverny/Ix
peterny/Ix
šesterny/Ix
dvojaky/Ix
trojaky/Ix
četveraky/Ix
peteraky/Ix
šesteraky/Ix
guslje/JH
psiholog/Iv
financije/JH
hirurg/Iv
kate/JG
srasti/JJ
smeti/JB
teolog/Iv
onoj/JF
jednorog/Iv
okolice/JH
razdreti/JD
tancevati/Iu
nosorog/Iv
vnutrnosti/JB
astrolog/Iv
nogavice/JH
papuče/JH
radiolog/Iv
geolog/Iv
pedagog/Iv
postrug/Iv
sociolog/Iv
uzbečsky/Ix
uzbeksky/Ix
kazahsky/Ix
kazašsky/Ix
tadžičsky/Ix
tadžiksky/Ix
porasti/JJ
drva/JE
grabje/JH
guse/JG
jelene/JG
kabare/JG
kote/JG
kozorog/Iv
ljve/JG
lise/JG
mlade/JG
narasti/JJ
obojaky/Ix
obrasti/JJ
obseg/JC
oddreti/JD
orle/JG
osle/JG
razrasti/JJ
vakacije/JH
valjcevati/Iu
varjag/Iv
viking/Iv
zoolog/Iv
virolog/Iv
ščene/JG
ping-pong/JC
obdreti/JD
sdreti/JD
kiriličsky/Ix
kirilsky/Ix
bičevati/Iu
poněktory/Ix
naočila/JE
glagolsky/Ix
distancevati/Iu
prodreti/JD
osmonog/Iv
aranževati/Iu
sanje/JH
zimbabve/JG
linčevati/Iu
